test/src/gt-norm-yamls/old-yamls/N-I-D-mitêh-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gên: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xêrox:
    Gên: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:
  
  Noun - mitêh - ok : # -m inanimatê dêpêndênt noun, heart    AEW C-initial NDI1
     mitêh+N+A+Sg: mitêh
     mitêh+N+A+Px1Sg+Sg: nitêh
     mitêh+N+A+Px2Sg+Sg: kitêh
     mitêh+N+A+Px1Pl+Sg: nitêhinân
     mitêh+N+A+Px12Pl+Sg: kitêhinaw
     mitêh+N+A+Px2Pl+Sg: kitêhiwâw

     mitêh+N+A+Pl: mitêha
     mitêh+N+A+Px1Sg+Pl: nitêha
     mitêh+N+A+Px2Sg+Pl: kitêha
     mitêh+N+A+Px1Pl+Pl: nitêhinâna
     mitêh+N+A+Px12Pl+Pl: kitêhinawa
     mitêh+N+A+Px2Pl+Pl: kitêhiwâwa

     mitêh+N+A+Px3Sg+Obv: otêha
     mitêh+N+A+Px3Pl+Obv: otêhiwâwa
     mitêh+N+A+Px4Sg+Obv: otêhiyiwa
     mitêh+N+A+Px4Pl+Obv: otêhiyiwa

     mitêh+N+A+Loc: mitêhihk
     mitêh+N+A+Px1Sg+Loc: nitêhihk
     mitêh+N+A+Px2Sg+Loc: kitêhihk
     mitêh+N+A+Px1Pl+Loc: nitêhinâhk
     mitêh+N+A+Px12Pl+Loc: kitêhinâhk
     mitêh+N+A+Px2Pl+Loc: kitêhiwâhk
     mitêh+N+A+Px3Sg+Loc: otêhihk
     mitêh+N+A+Px3Pl+Loc: otêhiwâhk
     mitêh+N+A+Px4Sg+Loc: otêhiyihk
     mitêh+N+A+Px4Pl+Loc: otêhiyihk

     mitêh+N+A+Der/Dim+N+A+Sg: mitêhis
     mitêh+N+A+Der/Dim+N+A+Sg: [mitêhis, mitêhisis]
     mitêh+N+A+Der/Dim+N+A+Px1Sg+Sg: [nitêhis, nitêhisis]
     mitêh+N+A+Der/Dim+N+A+Px2Sg+Sg: [kitêhis, kitêhisis]
     mitêh+N+A+Der/Dim+N+A+Px1Pl+Sg: [nitêhisinân, nitêhisisinân]
     mitêh+N+A+Der/Dim+N+A+Px12Pl+Sg: [kitêhisinaw, kitêhisisinaw]
     mitêh+N+A+Der/Dim+N+A+Px2Pl+Sg: [kitêhisiwâw, kitêhisisiwâw]
                
     mitêh+N+A+Der/Dim+N+A+Pl: [mitêhisa, mitêhisisa]
     mitêh+N+A+Der/Dim+N+A+Px1Sg+Pl: [nitêhisa, nitêhisisa]
     mitêh+N+A+Der/Dim+N+A+Px2Sg+Pl: [kitêhisa, kitêhisisa]
     mitêh+N+A+Der/Dim+N+A+Px1Pl+Pl: [nitêhisinâna, nitêhisisinâna]
     mitêh+N+A+Der/Dim+N+A+Px12Pl+Pl: [kitêhisinawa, kitêhisisinawa]
     mitêh+N+A+Der/Dim+N+A+Px2Pl+Pl: [kitêhisiwâwa, kitêhisisiwâwa]
